Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-321.01
Unit cost, defined.

Unit cost shall mean the total cost of a pickle card unit paid by a licensed organization to a distributor. Unit cost shall include the tax on definite profit prescribed in section 9-344 and any applicable sales tax. Unit cost shall also include any applicable federal gaming tax for which the licensed organization is liable in connection with its purchase or sale of a pickle card unit.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 17.